North Dakota, session 69, SB2074.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 57-51.1-07.7 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. By November thirtieth of each even-numbered year, starting in 2022, a city that receives a
grant from the fund and has the population of at least one thousand shall provide a report to
the state treasurer on the use of the funding. The state treasurer shall notify cities of the
reporting requirement by November first of each even-numbered year, starting in 2022. Upon
request, the state treasurer may provide an extension of up to fifteen days for a city to submit
the report. The state treasurer shall determine the format of the report. The report must
include the amount of grant funding received and spent by the city and a description of the
infrastructure projects completed in part or in whole with the grant funding. The state treasurer
shall make the reports available to the public on the state treasurer's website. A city that does
not provide the report in a timely manner or in the correct format is not eligible to receive a
grant from the fund for a period of two years starting from the date the report was due. If a city
uses the funding in a manner inconsistent with the requirements of this section as identified in
any financial audits conducted by the state auditor or an independent accounting firm, the
state treasurer shall reduce any future grants to that city by the amount spent that was
inconsistent with the requirements.

S. B. NO. 2074 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2074.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State